Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,251.04
Mobile food unit, defined.

Mobile food unit shall mean a vehicle mounted food establishment designed to be readily movable that returns to a commissary daily for cleanup and service.

Laws 1997, LB 199, § 13.